hu: A detektor érzékenysége: Állítható; Rögzített; Egyéb
de: Detektorempfindlichkeit: Einstellbar; Befestigt; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 探测器灵敏度: 可调节; 固定; 其他
sv: Detektorkänslighet: Justerbar; Fast; Övrigt
lt-LT: Detektoriaus jautrumas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Kita
ko: 감지기 감도: 조절식; 고정; 기타
it: Sensibilità del rilevatore: Regolabile; Fisso; Altro
th: ความไวของเครื่องตรวจจับ: แบบปรับได้; แบบแช่น้ำยารักษาสภาพ; อื่นๆ
pl: Czułość detektora: Regulowane; Stałe; Inne
en: Detector sensitivity: Adjustable; Fixed; Other
ru: Чувствительность металлоискателя: Регулируемый; Стационарный; Другое
zh-TW: 探測器靈敏度: 可調節式; 固定; 其他
ro-RO: Sensibilitate detector: Reglabilă; Fixă; Altele
fr: Sensibilité de détection: Ajustables; Fixé; Autre
tr: Dedektör Hassasiyeti: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Diğer
sl-SI: Občutljivost detektorja: Prilagodljivo; Fiksna; Drugo
es: Sensibilidad del detector: Ajustable; Fijo; Otros
da: Detektorfølsomhed: Justerbar; Fast; Andet
vi: Độ nhạy của máy dò: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Khác
nb: Detektorfølsomhet: Regulerbar; Fast; Annet
sk-SK: Citlivosť detektora: Nastaviteľný; Opravený; Iné
el: Ευαισθησία ανιχνευτή: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερή; Άλλο
pt-PT: Sensibilidade do detetor: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
ja: 検出器の感度: 調整可能; 固定; その他
nl: Detectorgevoeligheid: Verstelbaar; Vast; Andere
hr-HR: Osjetljivost detektora: Prilagodljivo; Fiksno; Ostalo
bg-BG: Чувствителност на детектора: Регулируем; Фиксиран; Други
cs: Citlivost detektoru: Nastavitelný; Pevný; Jiné
pt-BR: Sensibilidade do detector: Ajustável; Fixo; Outro
fi: Ilmaisimen herkkyys: Säädettävä; Pysyvä; Muu